apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
          <l>lusijdagá</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagi</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdaga</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdakga</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagága</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagiga</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdage</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdak</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdakge</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagáge</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagák</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagige</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagik</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdakgen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagágen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagigen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusij</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijga</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijge</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijgen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijs</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ela"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijsga</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijsge</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijsgen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijda</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdaga</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdage</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdak</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijdagen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijn</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijnga</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijnge</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijngen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusij</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijga</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijge</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijgen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijt</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijtga</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijtge</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lusijtgen</l>
          <r>os<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nubbes__Pron_Indef">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="galles"><i>galles</i><par n="nubbes__Pron_Indef"/></e>
    <e lm="nubbes"><i>nubbes</i><par n="nubbes__Pron_Indef"/></e>
